Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
18 SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
19 codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
20 This act shall be known and may be cited as the "State Parks
21 Emergency Maintenance Act".
22 SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
23 in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2254.3A of Title 74, unless
24 there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 12718 Page 1

1 Beginning December 31, 2025, and no later than December 31 each
2 year thereafter, the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department
3 shall submit in written or electronic format to the Governor, the
4 Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro
5 Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, the Appropriations and Budget
6 Chair of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
7 Appropriations Chair of the Oklahoma State Senate an annual report
8 on the maintenance, infrastructure, and construction needs of the
9 State Parks System overseen by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
10 Department. The annual report shall be known and may be cited as
11 the "Eight-Year State Parks Emergency Maintenance Plan", and shall
12 include:
13 1. Maintenance, infrastructure, and construction projects
14 listed in order of priority and critical need;
15 2. Cost estimates for each specific project listed in
16 paragraph 1 of this subsection;
17 3. Completion timeline for each specific project listed in
18 paragraph 1 of this subsection; and
19 4. A summary of the status of projects previously funded and
20 currently being funded pursuant to the provisions of the State Parks
21 Emergency Maintenance Act.
22 SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
23 in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2254.3B of Title 74, unless
24 there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 12718 Page 2

1 There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
2 for the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department to be designated
3 the "State Parks Emergency Maintenance Revolving Fund". The fund
4 shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
5 and shall consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Tourism and
6 Recreation Department eligible under law and directed for deposit to
7 such fund. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are
8 hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
9 Tourism and Recreation Department in amounts as authorized by the
10 Oklahoma Legislature, for the purpose of implementing the
11 Department's Eight-Year State Parks Emergency Maintenance Plan, as
12 described in Section 2 of this act; provided, that in no event shall
13 an amount greater than twenty percent (20%) of the annual amount
14 accruing to the fund shall be used for funding operational expenses
15 of the Department in any given state fiscal year. Expenditures from
16 said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
17 against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
18 Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
19 payment.
20 SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
21
22
23
24
Req. No. 12718 Page 3

1 SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
2 of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
3 declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
4 be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
5
6 60-1-12718 JL 02/17/25
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
Req. No. 12718 Page 4

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 1
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 30
Replace and relocate old failing fresh water
Water and Sewer Line Replacement - and sewer lines back within state park
Lake Texoma Lake Texoma boundaries Fresh Water Health & Safety 1 5,500,000 1
Repair collapsed portion of the cave, cave
Alabaster Caverns Cave Repair - Alabaster Caverns entrance and stairs Cave Health & Safety 1 5,500,000 2
Replace failing roof and repair/renovate
Roof and Repair - Forest Heritage exterior and interior of the Forest Heritage
Beavers Bend Center Center. Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 1 5,000,000 3
Address need for statewide tree and brush
System Wide Tree Removal - System Wide removal at all state parks. Forestry Health & Safety 1 2,000,000 4
Replace existing water line servicing the pool,
Lake Murray - Lodge Fresh Water Line - Lake Murray floating villas, water sports, and cabins Fresh Water Health & Safety 1 500,000 5
Replace existing water line from the park office
Eufaula Fresh Water Line - Office to Dogwood to the Dogwood Campground Fresh Water Health & Safety 1 1,500,000 6
Assess and repair/replace water lines
throughout the Black Mesa Park, install
Black Mesa Fresh Water Lines - Black Mesa additional shutoff as needed Fresh Water Health & Safety 1 1,500,000 7
Water and Sewer Line Replacement - Assess and repair/replace water and sewer
Cherokee Landing Cherokee Landing lines throughout Cherokee Landing Area Fresh Water Health & Safety 1 2,000,000 8
Replace sewer lines in the cabin area at
Greenleaf Sewer Line - Cabin Area Greenleaf Waste Water Health & Safety 1 1,000,000 9
Remove dead trees across the park that are
Greenleaf Tree Removal - Greenleaf potential fire and safety hazards Forestry Health & Safety 1 150,000 10
Remove dead trees across the park that are
Robbers Cave Tree Removal - Robbers Cave potential fire and safety hazards Forestry Health & Safety 1 100,000 11
Replace restroom in Cherokee Landing with
Cherokee Landing Restroom - Cherokee Landing new full service facilities Restroom Health & Safety New 1 400,000 12
Add portable restrooms to day use areas.
Restrooms need to be moved when the areas
Tenkiller Restroom - Day Use Areas are flooded Restroom Health & Safety New 1 450,000 13
Repair/renovate restroom at Grandview
Cherokee Grand Lake Restroom - Grandview Campground Restroom Health & Safety Renovation 1 75,000 14
Grand Cherokee Vault Toilets - Little Blue Area Install new vault toilets in the Little Blue Area Restroom Health & Safety New 1 150,000 15
Replace restroom at Twin Bridges with new full
Twin Bridges Restroom - Twin Bridges service facilities Restroom Health & Safety New 1 200,000 16
Repair/renovate existing restroom in Gobbler
Greenleaf Restroom - Gobbler Ridge Ridge Campground Restroom Health & Safety Renovation 1 100,000 17
Demo and replace restrooms 2 and 9 with new
Lake Texoma Restrooms - Location 2 and 9 full service facilities Restroom Health & Safety Renovation 1 450,000 18
Replace 4 restrooms at Sequoyah Bay with new
Sequoyah Bay Restrooms - Sequoyah Bay full service facilities Restroom Health & Safety New 1 800,000 19
Install booster pump to stabilize the restroom
Salt Plains Restroom - River Road Area water pressure in the River Road area Restroom Health & Safety Renovation 1 1,500 20
Replace skylights as needed in various CXT
Fort Cobb Replace Skylights - Park CXTs restrooms throughout the park Restroom Health & Safety Renovation 1 500,000 21
Replace windows as needed in various CXT
Fort Cobb Replace Windows - Park CXTs restrooms throughout the park Restroom Health & Safety Renovation 1 500,000 22
Add new laundry facility for Robbers Cave,
Robbers Cave - Lodge Laundry Facility - Robbers Cave more storage and equipment are needed Laundry Health & Safety New 1 500,000 23
Assess and address the laundry facility at
Tenkiller Laundry Facility - Tenkiller Tenkiller, need additional space and equipment Laundry Health & Safety Renovation 1 250,000 24
Add new laundry facility for Boiling Springs,
Boiling Springs Laundry Facility - Boiling Springs more storage and equipment are needed Laundry Health & Safety New 1 500,000 25
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Parkview Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Beavers Bend Area cabins 24-28 in the Parkview Area Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 1 800,000 26
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Duplex Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Beavers Bend Cabins the 6 duplex cabins, total of 12 units Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 1 1,500,000 27
Spavinaw Restroom - Spavinaw Add new restroom to the Spavinaw Area Restroom Health & Safety New 1 350,000 28
Quartz Mountain - Full assessment for renovation and/or
Lodge Renovation - Quartz Mountain PAC repurposing of the PAC at Quartz Mountain PAC Health & Safety Renovation 1 5,000,000 29
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 1 Contingency Allowance - Year 1 Contingency Contingency 1 3,723,500 30
Project Estimated Cost 41,000,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 1 41,000,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 2
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 42
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Sequoyah Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Sequoyah - Lodge Cabins 45 cabins at Sequoyah Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 2 6,750,000 1
Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Greenleaf Cabin Repair/Renovation - Greenleaf 14 CC cabins at Greenleaf. Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 2 2,800,000 2
Design and implement effective erosion control
Greenleaf Erosion Control - Greenleaf Cabins measures around the Greenleaf Cabins Cabins Health & Safety 2 500,000 3
Cabin Repair/Renovation - McGee Repair/renovation of the Lake Huts at McGee
McGee Creek Creek Creek Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 2 2,000,000 4
Replace bedframes and mattresses in all
Roman Nose - Lodge Cabin FFE - Roman Nose Cabins Roman Nose Cabins Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 2 25,000 5
Roman Nose - Lodge Cabin Windows - Roman Nose Cabins Install new windows at all Roman Nose Cabins Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 2 75,000 6
Update deck and landscaping around the
Roman Nose - Lodge Landscaping - Pioneer Cabin Pioneer Cabin Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 2 50,000 7
Repair/replace entrance doors at Roman Nose
Roman Nose - Lodge Entrance Doors - Roman Nose Lodge Lodge Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 10,000 8
Repair/replace all entrances to Sequoyah Hall
Sequoyah - Lodge Building Repairs - Sequoyah Lodge to prevent water from entering the building Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 20,000 9
Repair/replace exterior items as needed for
Sequoyah Lodge, also address landscaping
Sequoyah - Lodge Building Repairs - Sequoyah Lodge issues Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 2,150,000 10
Assess and repair water leaks to office and
Roman Nose - Lodge Building Repairs - Roman Nose Lodge room 110 Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 25,000 11
Assess and replace shower pans and
Roman Nose - Lodge Room Repairs - Roman Nose Lodge foundation issues in guest rooms Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 55,000 12
Quartz Mountain - Replace carpet in the foyer area of the banquet
Lodge Building Repairs - Banquet Room room Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 75,000 13
Quartz Mountain - Replace Entrance Doors - Quartz Replace all entrance doors at the lodge and
Lodge Mountain Lodge cabins Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 150,000 14
Quartz Mountain - Building Repairs - Quartz Mountain Repair/replace exterior wood columns that are
Lodge Lodge damaged Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 150,000 15
Quartz Mountain - Repair/replace water lines at the Quartz
Lodge Pavilion Repairs - Quartz Mountain Mountain Pavilions Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 150,000 16
Quartz Mountain - Bunkhouse Repair/Renovation - Quartz Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Lodge Mountain the Bunkhouse Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 400,000 17
Quartz Mountain - Room Updates - Quartz Mountain Restroom repair for lodge rooms and cabin 10
Lodge Lodge and 11 Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 500,000 18
Quartz Mountain - Amphitheater Repair/Renovation - Repair/renovation of the failing lodge
Lodge Quartz Mountain amphitheater. Includes seating and stag areas Lodge Operations Health & Safety Renovation 2 400,000 19
Repair/renovation of all Blue Jay Knob, Shady
Grove, Fox Squirrel, and Flying Squirrel RV
sites. Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Tenkiller RV Campground - Tenkiller electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 7,000,000 20
Repair/renovate Eagles Point, Bluff View,
Upper Fisherman's Point, Hickory Flats, Lower
Fisherman's Point tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Tenkiller Tent Campground - Tenkiller needed Tent CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 670,000 21
Repair/renovation of all Post Oak RV sites. Will
Lake Thunderbird RV Campground - Post Oak include: sitework, water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 1,050,000 22
Repair/renovation of all Hog Creek RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Lake Thunderbird RV Campground - Hog Creek Area electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 1,000,000 23
Repair/renovation of all Rose Rock RV sites.
RV Campground - Rose Rock Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Lake Thunderbird Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 950,000 24
Repair/renovation of all Little Sandy RV sites.
RV Campground - Little Sandy Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Lake Thunderbird Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 600,000 25
Replace retaining wall above sites 13-22 in the
Lake Thunderbird RV Campground - Hickory Hill Hickory Hill Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 50,000 26
Repair/renovation of all Hitchin Post RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Arrowhead RV Campground - Hitchin Post electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 1,500,000 27
Replace electric service and pedestals for all
Keystone RV Campground - Lake Country sites in the Lake Country RV Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 2 500,000 28
Twin Bridges Boat Ramp - Anglers Paradise Repair/replace two existing boat ramps Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 100,000 29
Repair/replace boat ramp and assess for better
Honey Creek Boat Ramp - Honey Creek public access Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 150,000 30
Tenkiller Boat Ramp - Fisherman's Point Repair/replace existing boat ramp Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 31
Repair/replace eight existing boat ramps
Sequoyah Boat Ramps - Sequoyah throughout the park Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 400,000 32
Replace existing boat ramp in the Cypress Row
Greenleaf Boat Ramp - Cypress Row area Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 33
Lake Thunderbird Boat Ramp - Sailboat Area Repair/replace existing boat ramp Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 34
Lake Thunderbird Boat Ramp - Post Oak Repair/replace existing boat ramp Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 35
Lake Thunderbird Boat Ramp - North Sentinel Repair/replace existing boat ramp Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 36
Lake Thunderbird Boat Ramp - Fisherman's Point Repair/replace the west side boat ramp Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 37
Repair/replace boat ramps in the following
areas: Bay View, Catfish Bay, 300 Area, Joe's
Lake Texoma Boat Ramps - Lake Texoma Campground, Ben's Campground Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 250,000 38
Lake Murray - Park Boat Ramp - North Boat Ramp Area Repair/replace existing boat ramp Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 50,000 39
Assess relocation of boat ramp to protect from
Fort Cobb Boat Ramp - Lemons Landing wind exposure Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 100,000 40
Black Mesa Boat Ramps - Black Mesa Repair/replace boat ramps at Lake Carl Etling Boat Ramp Ramps New 2 100,000 41
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 2 Contingency Allowance - Year 2 Contingency Contingency 2 3,945,000 42
Project Estimated Cost 35,000,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 7,500,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 2
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 42
Project Estimated Cost - Year 2 42,500,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 3
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 27
Add 5 new cabins along the Boiling Springs Golf
Boiling Springs Cabin Additions - BS Golf Course Course Cabins Upgrade New 3 1,250,000 1
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Boiling Repair/renovation of exterior and interior of
Boiling Springs Springs existing cabins Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 3 400,000 2
Repair/renovation of Tipps Point and Dukes
RV Campgrounds - Tipps Point and Forest RV Campgrounds: includes site work,
Lake Murray - Park Dukes Forest water, electric, and sewer RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 5,000,000 3
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Lake Repair/renovation of exterior and interior of
Lake Wister Wister existing cabins Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 3 1,400,000 4
Assess and propose repair options for
Lake Wister Cabin Foundation - Lake Wister foundation and structural damage Cabins Health & Safety Renovation 3 200,000 5
Repair/renovation of all Playside RV sites. Will
Greenleaf RV Campground - Playside Area include: sitework, water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 1,280,000 6
Repair/renovate tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Greenleaf Tent Campground - Greenleaf needed Tent CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 250,000 7
RV Campground - Riverside Repair electric service in Riverside RV
Cherokee Grand Lake Campground Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 75,000 8
Repair/replace erosion barriers in Squirrel
Honey Creek Erosion Control - Squirrel Hollow Hollow Campground RV CG Health & Safety 3 200,000 9
Replace water and electric service at Fern RV
Beavers Bend RV Campground - Fern Campground Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 165,000 10
Replace water and electric service to all sites in
Beavers Bend RV Campground - Quail Campground the Quail RV Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 180,000 11
Replace water and electric service to all sites in
Beavers Bend RV Campground - Turkey Campground the Turkey RV Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 250,000 12
Replace electric service and pedestals for all
Eufaula RV Campground - Deep Fork RV sites in Deep Fork RV Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 240,000 13
Repair/renovation of all Echo Ridge RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Arrowhead RV Campground - Echo Ridge electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 2,000,000 14
Repair/renovation of all Cypress Row RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Greenleaf RV Campground - Cypress Row electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 2,000,000 15
Repair/renovation of all Deer Run RV sites.
RV Campground - Deer Run Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Greenleaf Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 2,080,000 16
Repair/renovation of all Gobbler Ridge RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Greenleaf RV Campground - Gobbler Ridge Area electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 3,360,000 17
Repair/renovation and possible reconfiguration
RV Campground - Cottonwood of Cottonwood Campground. Campground has
Foss Campground ongoing flooding issues RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 3,200,000 18
Repair/renovation of Black Mesa RV area to
Black Mesa RV Campground - Black Mesa include: sitework, water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 2,000,000 19
Repair/replace electric and add sewer to 5 sites
Quartz Mountain - Park RV Campground - Mountain View in the Mountain View RV Campground RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 250,000 20
Repair/renovation of River Run RV sites. Will
Quartz Mountain - Park RV Campground - River Run include: sitework, water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 480,000 21
Repair/renovation of Upper Live Oak RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Quartz Mountain - Park RV Campground - Upper Live Oak electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 560,000 22
Repair/renovation of Red Bud RV sites. Will
Quartz Mountain - Park RV Campground - Red Bud Area include: sitework, water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 800,000 23
Repair/renovation of all Whitetail RV sites.
RV Campground - Whitetail Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Boiling Springs Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 1,600,000 24
Repair/renovation of all Springhill RV sites.
RV Campground - Springhill Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Boiling Springs Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 3 1,800,000 25
Assess and install retaining wall and sitework to
Erosion Control - Whitetail Tent better define camp sites and create and ADA
Boiling Springs Campground accessible site. Tent CG Health & Safety 3 150,000 26
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 3 Contingency Allowance - Year 3 Contingency Contingency 3 3,830,000 27
Project Estimated Cost 35,000,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 7,500,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 3 42,500,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 4
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 25
Full exterior and interior renovation of 22
Keystone Cabin Repair/Renovation - Keystone cabins at Keystone Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 4 3,500,000 1
Assess to renovate or replace 3 cabins at Lake
Lake Wister Cabin Renovation - Lake Wister Wister. Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 4 600,000 2
Erosion control need to campsite 51 in the
Lake Wister RV Campground - Victor Campground Victor Campground RV CG Health & Safety 4 50,000 3
Repair/renovation of Cowboy and Buttercup RV
Campground sites. Will include: sitework,
Little Sahara RV Campground - North Campgrounds water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 2,000,000 4
Repair/renovation of all Oasis RV Campground
sites. Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Little Sahara RV Campground - Oasis Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 2,400,000 5
Repair/renovation of 2 RV campground areas at
Little Sahara, need to assess further for site
Little Sahara RV Campground - Little Sahara needs RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 2,500,000 6
Repair/renovation of all Scissortail RV sites.
RV Campground - Scissortail Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Quartz Mountain - Park Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 1,600,000 7
RV Campground - Cottonwood Repair/renovation of 37 Cottonwood RV sites,
Quartz Mountain - Park Campground Will include: sitework and electric RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 1,850,000 8
Repair/renovation of all Bitter Creek RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Roman Nose RV Campground - Bitter Creek electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 400,000 9
Repair/renovation of all Cedar Cove RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Roman Nose RV Campground - Cedar Cove electric. Add electric to tent sites RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 660,000 10
Repair/renovation of Canyon Vista RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Roman Nose RV Campground - Canyon Vista electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 1,900,000 11
Repair/renovation and assessment to
reconfigure the Black Jack RV campground.
RV Campground - Black Jack Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Fort Cobb Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 3,300,000 12
Repair/renovation of all Deer Run RV sites.
RV Campground - Deer Run Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Fort Cobb Campground electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 4 5,800,000 13
Full renovation of all Mouse Creek RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
electric. Redesign for better horse
Foss RV Campground accommodation RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 4 1,500,000 14
Repair/renovate all Buffalo Bend RV sites. Will
Foss RV Campground - Buffalo Bend include: sitework, water, and electric RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 4 700,000 15
Repair/renovate all Cutberth RV sites. Will
Foss RV Campground - Cutberth Area include: sitework, water, and electric RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 4 1,000,000 16
Assess and repair/replace any structural
damage, electric, and fixtures in Pavilions 1, 2,
Tenkiller Pavilion Repairs - Tenkiller 3, 4 Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 4 300,000 17
Demo existing structures to remove potential
Demo Structures - 2 pavilions and 3 risk of injury to park guest. Various
Arrowhead restrooms campgrounds Pavilions Health & Safety 4 50,000 18
Lake Texoma Demo Structures - Fun Park Demo abandoned Fun Park, safety hazard Park Operations Health & Safety 4 150,000 19
Building Renovation/Repair - Park Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Lake Texoma Office and Nature Center the Park Office and Nature Center Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 4 500,000 20
Assess and repair/replace roofs, siding, fixtures
Lake Texoma Pavilion Repairs - Lake Texoma at Pavilion 6, 7, and 8 Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 4 225,000 21
Replace roofs on 5 pavilions at Quartz
Quartz Mountain - Park Roof Replacement - Park Pavilions Mountain Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 4 150,000 22
Assess and repair/replace 7 mini shelters in the
Great Plains State Park Pavilion Repairs - Great Plains Great Plains Park Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 4 30,000 23
Roof Replacement - Three Springs
Roman Nose Pavilion Replace roof on the Three Springs Pavilion Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 4 75,000 24
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 4 Contingency Allowance - Year 4 Contingency Contingency 4 3,720,000 25
Project Estimated Cost 34,960,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 7,500,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 4 42,460,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 5
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 89
Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Tenkiller Cabin Repair/Renovation - Tenkiller 38 cabins at Tenkiller Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 5 5,700,000 1
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Courtyard Repair/renovate exterior and interior of the
Tenkiller Cottages Courtyard Cottages Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 5 1,000,000 2
Renovate 27 Sandy Beach RV sites. Sitework
Salt Plains RV Campground - Sandy Beach only. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 5 675,000 3
RV Campground - River Road and Update electric and add sewer to RV sites in
Salt Plains Sandy Beach River Road and Sandy Beach RV Campgrounds RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 5 1,470,000 4
Salt Plains Playground - Sandy Beach Add new playground to the Sandy Beach Area Playground Upgrade New 5 150,000 5
Repair/renovation of Sunset Cove RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Fort Cobb RV Campground - Sunset Cove electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 5 3,200,000 6
Repair/renovation of Seminole, Creek,
RV Campground - Seminole, Creek, Chickasaw RV sites. Will include: sitework,
Cherokee Landing Chickasaw Ares water, sewer, and electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 5 2,500,000 7
Repair/replace the small shade structures
Black Mesa Pavilions - Black Mesa throughout the park in day use areas Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 5 500,000 8
Renovate CCC pavilion in Picnic Area, needs
Boiling Springs Pavilion - Picnic Area roof and rock work Pavilions Health & Safety Renovation 5 100,000 9
Repair/renovation of exterior and interior of
Boiling Springs Manager Residence - Boiling Springs the manger's residence Residence Health & Safety Renovation 5 100,000 10
Repair/renovation of exterior and interior of
Boiling Springs Employee Residence - Boiling Springs the employee residence Residence Health & Safety Renovation 5 100,000 11
Repair/renovation of exterior and interior of
Foss Manager Residence - Foss the manger's residence Residence Health & Safety Renovation 5 75,000 12
Quartz Mountain - Roof Replacement - Manager's Replace roof at the Quartz Mountain
Lodge Residence manager's residence Residence Health & Safety Renovation 5 25,000 13
Exterior repairs and new HVAC system at the
McGee Creek Ranger Residence - McGee Creek ranger's residence at McGee Creek Residence Health & Safety Renovation 5 75,000 14
Repair/renovate employee residences at
Sequoyah Park Residences - Sequoyah Sequoyah Residence Health & Safety Renovation 5 375,000 15
Robbers Cave Demo Structure - Employee Residence Demo an employee residence at Robbers Cave Residence Health & Safety 5 15,000 16
Repair/replace pool interior and decking to
Honey Creek Pool Renovation - Honey Creek address safety concerns for guest Pool Health & Safety Renovation 5 450,000 17
Replace electric service and pedestals for all
Honey Creek RV Campground - Raccoon Ridge sites in the Raccoon Ridge RV Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 5 160,000 18
Replace electric service and pedestals for sites
RV Campground - Echo Hollow and in the Echo Hollow and Gopher Valley RV
Twin Bridges Gopher Valley Campgrounds RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 5 100,000 19
Repair leaking gutter lines, gutter tiles, and
Osage Hills Pool Repairs - Osage Hills sand filter at Osage Hills pool Pool Health & Safety Renovation 5 100,000 20
Osage Hills Pool Bathhouse - Osage Hills Renovate existing pool bathhouse Pool Health & Safety Renovation 5 150,000 21
Quartz Mountain - Repair/replace pool deck. Ongoing issues with
Lodge Pool Deck - Quartz Mountain Lodge decking cracks and holes. Pool Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 22
Complete renovation of the Arrowhead park
Arrowhead Renovation - Arrowhead Park Office office Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 2,000,000 23
Replace park office roof, assess for additional
Eufaula Roof Replacement - Eufaula Park Office renovation needs Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 500,000 24
Tucker Tower Renovation - Lake Assess and provide repairs to address water
Lake Murray - Park Murray leaks and HVAC issues Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 500,000 25
Maintenance Barn Roof - Lake Replace the roof on the Maintenance Barn at
Lake Thunderbird Thunderbird Lake Thunderbird Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 15,000 26
Entrance Redesign - Little Axe Demo or remove the existing gatehouse and
Lake Thunderbird Campground redesign entrance to campground Park Operations Health & Safety 5 15,000 27
Replace existing hazardous fuel tanks with new
Lake Thunderbird Fuel Cells - Lake Thunderbird fuel cells, 2 cells needed at 2 locations Park Operations Health & Safety New 5 50,000 28
Enclosure Repairs - Sequoyah Beaver Repair the pond in the beaver enclosure at
Sequoyah Pond Sequoyah Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 1,000 29
Add new maintenance barn to the Sequoyah
Sequoyah Maintenance Barn - Sequoyah Maintenance Yard Park Operations Health & Safety New 5 100,000 30
Expand the existing animal enclosures at
Sequoyah Animal Enclosures - Sequoyah Sequoyah Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 100,000 31
Repair/Renovation - Sequoyah Nature Repair/Renovate the interior of the Nature
Sequoyah Center Center Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 150,000 32
Repair/replace logs and doors at the Robbers
Robbers Cave Building Repairs - Nature Center Cave Nature Center Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 250,000 33
Demo existing structure, prepare site for future
Salt Plains Demo Structure - Community Building use Park Operations Health & Safety 5 15,000 34
Natural Falls HVAC Replacement - Park Office Replace the HVAC system at the park office Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 25,000 35
Natural Falls Window Replacement - Park Office Replace windows at the park office Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 36
Water and Sewer Lines - Maintenance Add new water and sewer lines to the existing
Bernice Building Maintenance Building Park Operations Health & Safety 5 75,000 37
Repair/renovate the Nature Center and
Bernice Building Repair - Nature Center connecting restroom Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 500,000 38
Roof Replacement - Greenleaf Park
Greenleaf Office Replace park office roof Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 25,000 39
Greenleaf ADA Dock - Kids Pond Replace the ADA fishing dock for the Kids Pond Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 40
Building Repair/Renovation - Hoot Owl Repair/renovate exterior and provide ADA
Greenleaf Building parking and building access Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 200,000 41
Roof Replacement - Maintenance
Cherokee Landing Building Replace roof on the Maintenance Building Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 20,000 42
Install new entrance gate for better traffic
Cherokee Landing Entrance Gate - Cherokee Landing control into the park Park Operations Health & Safety New 5 50,000 43
Assess and redesign the maintenance
compound, add new fuel cells and demo
Cherokee Landing Area Redesign - Maintenance Area unwanted structures Park Operations Health & Safety 5 100,000 44
Roof Replacement - Boiling Springs Park
Boiling Springs Office Replace park office roof Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 25,000 45

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 5
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 89
Patio and Stairway Renovation - Boiling Repair/replace existing patio and stairway to
Boiling Springs Springs Park Office the springs at the park office. Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 75,000 46
Assess and perform sitework around Shaul
Lake to provide walkways and fishing areas for
Boiling Springs Site Work - Shaul Lake Shoreline the public, include ADA access Park Operations Health & Safety 5 500,000 47
Building Repair/Renovation - Park Repair/renovate the exterior and interior of the
Foss Office park office, includes updated landscaping Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 250,000 48
Replace multiple roofs on park operations
Fort Cobb Replace Roofs - Park Buildings building in the Fort Cobb Park Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 250,000 49
Fort Cobb Replace Windows - Park Office Replace windows in the Park Office Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 250,000 50
HVAC Replacement - Great Plains HVAC replacement at the Great Plains Visitor
Great Plains State Park Visitor Center Center Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 15,000 51
Demo an old water tower behind the Boat
Great Plains State Park Demo Water Tower - Great Plains Ramp CXT Park Operations Health & Safety 5 15,000 52
Exterior repairs to the park office at McGee
McGee Creek Park Office - McGee Creek Creek Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 75,000 53
Demo old structure next to new restroom on
Lake Wister Demo Old Restroom - Quarry Island Quarry Island Park Operations Health & Safety 5 15,000 54
Lake Wister Fuel Cells - Lake Wister Replace 2 fuel cells Park Operations Health & Safety New 5 20,000 55
Repair/replace existing maintenance structures
Black Mesa Building Repairs - Maintenance Area at Black Mesa Park Operations Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 56
Widen and resurface trail to allow for ADA
Bernice Trail - Bernice access Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 150,000 57
Bernice Trail Towers - ADA Trail Install two new wildlife towers on the ADA Trail Trails Health & Safety New 5 150,000 58
Trail Maintenance - Greenleaf Main Perform general maintenance and widening of
Greenleaf Trail the main hiking trail at Greenleaf Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 500,000 59
Assess and resurface Redfox Trail to convert to
Cherokee Landing Trail ADA Access - Redfox Trail ADA accessible Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 200,000 60
Boiling Springs Trail Bridges - River Trail Repair/replace two bridges on the River Trail Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 61
Boiling Springs Trail Bridges - Scout Trail Repair/replace 9 bridges on the Scout Trail Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 225,000 62
Lake Thunderbird Trail Bridge - Hog Creek Repair/replace trail bridge in Hog Creek Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 63
ADA Trail updates to include: Erosion control,
Lake Thunderbird Trail - ADA Hiking Trail signage, seating areas Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 64
Replace damaged trail bridge in the Pecan
Lake Murray - Park Trail Bridge - Pecan Grove Grove area Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 750,000 65
Complete the ADA from the springs to the
Roman Nose Trail - ADA Trail parking lot Trails Health & Safety Renovation 5 100,000 66
Remove trees and brush along the Lake Murray
Lake Murray - Park Dam Cleanup - Lake Murray Dam Dam Dams Health & Safety 5 150,000 67
Repair/replace failing ADA courtesy dock at
Fort Cobb Dock Repairs - Lemon Hill Lemon Hill Day Use Dock Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 68
Extend the fishing dock further into the lake to
Sequoyah Dock Repair - Sequoyah Lodge better handle high or low water conditions Dock Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 69
Repair/Replace existing swim platform in the
Robbers Cave Swim Dock - Robbers Cave beach area of Lake Carlton Dock Health & Safety Renovation 5 50,000 70
Replace damaged fishing dock at Great Plains,
Great Plains State Park Dock Replacement - Great Plains need to consult with BOR Dock Health & Safety Renovation 5 150,000 71
Repair/replace Palapa shade structures in the
Sunset Beach Area. Replace ADA access, vault
Foss Shade Structures - Sunset Beach toilets Day Use Health & Safety Renovation 5 200,000 72
Install retaining wall to control erosion and
blowing sand around the parking area of
Foss Erosion Control - Sunset Beach Sunset Beach Day Use Health & Safety 5 100,000 73
Sewer Lagoon - Cottonwood Install new fencing around the lagoon at
Foss Campground Cottonwood Campground Fencing Health & Safety New 5 75,000 74
Replace fencing around the horse stables and
Sequoyah Fencing - Horse Stable Area riding areas Fencing Health & Safety New 5 25,000 75
Install wind break fencing at Oasis
Little Sahara Fencing - Oasis Campground Campground Fencing Health & Safety New 5 75,000 76
Osage Hills Playground - RV Campground Replace playground in the RV Campground Playground Health & Safety New 5 150,000 77
Replace, install new playground in Catfish Bay
Lake Texoma Playground - Lake Texoma and Joe's Campgrounds Playground Health & Safety New 5 300,000 78
Keystone Playground - Green Country Replace playground in the Green Country Area Playground Health & Safety New 5 150,000 79
Replace, install new playgrounds in the
Greenleaf Playground - Greenleaf Playside Area and Gobble Ridge Campground Playground Health & Safety New 5 300,000 80
Great Plains State Park Playground - Great Plains Replace playground in the Day Use Area Playground Health & Safety New 5 150,000 81
Replace playgrounds in Buffalo Bend, Cutberth,
Foss Playground - Foss Cedar Point, and Sandy Beach areas. Playground Health & Safety New 5 600,000 82
Replace playground in the Black Jack
Fort Cobb Playground - Black Jack Campground Campground Playground Health & Safety New 5 150,000 83
Replace two playground areas in the Bernice
Bernice Playground - Bernice Area Playground Health & Safety New 5 300,000 84
Repair/replace damaged portions of the
existing cart path, reroute as needed to
Arrowhead - Golf Course Cart Path - Arrowhead GC address erosion issues Golf Health & Safety Renovation 5 300,000 85
Cedar Creek - Golf Repair/replace damaged portions of the
Course Cart Path - Cedar Creek GC existing cart path Golf Health & Safety Renovation 5 300,000 86
Repair/replace damaged portions of the
Roman Nose - Golf existing cart path, reroute as needed to
Course Cart Path - Roman Nose GC address erosion issues Golf Health & Safety Renovation 5 150,000 87
Renovate all Ward's Campground RV sites. Will
Lake Wister RV Campground - Wards Campground include: sitework, water, and electric RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 5 1,250,000 88
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 5 Contingency Allowance - Year 5 Contingency Contingency 5 4,274,000 89
Project Estimated Cost 34,925,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 7,500,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 5 42,425,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 6
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 73
Repair/renovation of 100 Sequoyah Bay RV
sites. Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Sequoyah Bay RV Campground - Sequoyah Bay electric. RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 8,000,000 1
Sequoyah Bay Playground - Sequoyah Bay Add new playground at Sequoyah Bay Playground Revenue Loss New 6 150,000 2
Full repair/renovation of Cherokee RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
electric. Redesign layout for more space
Sequoyah RV Campground - Cherokee Area between sites RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 5,000,000 3
Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of
Sequoyah - Lodge Cabin Repair/Renovation - Bunkhouse the Bunkhouse Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 800,000 4
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate exterior and interior of the
Lake Wister Camp dining hall and restroom at the Group Camp Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 6 750,000 5
Replace existing pavilions with new structures,
Keystone Pavilion Repairs - Keystone 5 locations Pavilions Revenue Loss New 6 750,000 6
Replace electric service and pedestals for all
Alabaster Caverns RV Campground - Mesa Campground sites in the Mesa RV Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 55,000 7
RV Campground - Lakeside Replace electric service and pedestals for all
Cherokee Grand Lake Campground sites in the Lakeview RV Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 75,000 8
Renovate tent sites with new fixtures and
Lake Thunderbird Tent Campground - Rose Rock provide electric and water repairs as needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 110,000 9
Renovate tent sites with new fixtures and
Lake Thunderbird Tent Campground - Hog Creek provide electric and water repairs as needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 380,000 10
Renovate tent sites with new fixtures and
Lake Thunderbird Tent Campground - North Sentinel provide electric and water repairs as needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 160,000 11
Remove dead and unwanted trees and brush
Tenkiller Tree Removal - Tenkiller Cabins restricting lake views from the Tenkiller Cabins Forestry Revenue Loss 6 100,000 12
Repair/replace damaged portions of the
Lake Murray - Golf existing cart path, reroute as needed to
Course Cart Path - Lake Murray GC address erosion issues Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 6 500,000 13
Assess and replace the existing HVAC
HVAC Replacement - Lake Murray equipment. Need to determine room and
Lake Murray - Lodge Lodge common area requirements Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 500,000 14
Building Maintenance - Lake Murray
Lake Murray - Lodge Lodge Repaint the exterior of all lodge structures Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 200,000 15
Replace roofs on 2 restrooms, pavilion, well
Bernice Roof Replacement - Bernice Structures house, and storage building Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 100,000 16
Gloss Mountain Kiosk Repairs - Gloss Mountain Renovate and repair information kiosk Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 75,000 17
Repair/replace existing retaining wall at select
Great Plains State Park Erosion Control - Great Plains campsites Park Operations Revenue Loss 6 20,000 18
Assess and perform sitework around Boecher
Roman Nose Site Work - Boecher Lake Shoreline Lake to provide better public access Park Operations Revenue Loss 6 250,000 19
Building Repair/Renovation - Riding
Sequoyah Stables Renovate the Riding Stables at Sequoyah Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 20,000 20
Sequoyah Eagle Enclosure - Sequoyah Add new Eagle Enclosure at Sequoyah Park Operations Revenue Loss New 6 10,000 21
Multiple roof replacements: Regional Admin,
Twin Bridges Roof Replacements - Twin Bridges Lake Huts, Restrooms, and Slant Huts Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 280,000 22
Install new bridge across the creek in the
Alabaster Caverns Trail Bridge - Canyon Campground Canyon Campground Park Operations Upgrade New 6 25,000 23
Fort Cobb HWY Signage - Fort Cobb Install park signage on HWY 152 and 146 Signage Revenue Loss New 6 40,000 24
Install new signage within the park and on
Foss Signage - Foss access HWYs Signage Revenue Loss New 6 100,000 25
Greenleaf Signage - Greenleaf Repair/replace select park signs Signage Revenue Loss New 6 250,000 26
Honey Creek Entrance Sign - Honey Creek Replace, install new park entrance sign Signage Revenue Loss New 6 20,000 27
Honey Creek Signage - Honey Creek Repair/replace select park signs Signage Revenue Loss New 6 20,000 28
Replace the overlook deck along the Family Fun
Greenleaf Trail Repairs - Family Fun Trail Trail Trails Revenue Loss Renovation 6 25,000 29
Foss Picnic Tables - Overlook Area Replace picnic tables in the Overlook Area Day Use Upgrade Renovation 6 15,000 30
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Lake Full exterior and interior repair/renovation of 4
Lake Texoma Texoma cabins at Lake Texoma Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 1,000,000 31
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Twin Repair/renovate the interior and HVAC of the
Twin Bridges Bridges huts to allow for better year round usage Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 125,000 32
Repair/renovate tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Roman Nose Tent Campground - Beaver Dam needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 160,000 33
Repair/renovate tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Cherokee Landing Tent Campground - Cherokee Landing needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 200,000 34
Repair/renovate tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Sequoyah Tent Campground - Creek Area needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 200,000 35
Repair/renovate tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Sequoyah Tent Campground - Chickasaw Area needed. Assess for new restroom facilities Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 350,000 36
Repair/renovate tent sites with new fixtures
and provide electric and water repairs as
Sequoyah Tent Campground - Sequoyah needed Tent CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 350,000 37
Demo existing unsafe pavilions, resurface sport
Boiling Springs Group Camp Repairs - Group Camp 2 court in Group Camp 2 Group Camp Health & Safety Renovation 6 225,000 38
Assess and repair/replace any structural
Boiling Springs Pavilion Repairs - South (Small) damage, electric, and fixtures in South Pavilion Pavilions Revenue Loss Renovation 6 50,000 39
Assess and repair/replace any structural
damage, electric, and fixtures in E.L. Ware
Boiling Springs Pavilion Repairs - E.L. Ware Pavilion Pavilions Revenue Loss Renovation 6 75,000 40
Assess and repair/replace any structural
Boiling Springs Pavilion Repairs - North (Large) damage, electric, and fixtures in North Pavilion Pavilions Revenue Loss Renovation 6 75,000 41
Building Repair/Renovation - Group
Lake Murray - Park Camp 1 Add HVAC to 30 cabins and Recreation Hall Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 6 500,000 42
Beavers Bend Lodge Room PTACs - Beavers Bend Lodge Replace PTAC units in all lodge rooms Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 100,000 43

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 6
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 73
Beavers Bend Lodge Room Updates - Beavers Bend Lodge Replace patio doors with built-in blinds Lodge Operations Upgrade Renovation 6 40,000 44
Sequoyah - Lodge Building Repairs - Sequoyah Hall Replace the garage door at Sequoyah Hall Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 40,000 45
Furniture Updates - Lobby and Lounge Replace FFE in the Lodge Lobby and Lounge
Sequoyah - Lodge Areas areas Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 50,000 46
Sequoyah - Lodge Furniture Updates - Pool Area Replace FFE in the Pool Area Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 50,000 47
Replace the blinds and window shades in all
Sequoyah - Lodge Room Updates - Sequoyah Lodge lodge rooms Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 210,000 48
Sequoyah - Lodge Room Updates - Sequoyah Lodge Replace bedframes and mattresses in all rooms Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 300,000 49
Amphitheater Repair/Renovation - Repair/renovation of the amphitheater.
Sequoyah Sequoyah Includes seating and stag areas Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 150,000 50
Repair/renovate the sports court, new fencing
Sequoyah - Lodge Sports Court - Sequoyah Lodge and lights Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 125,000 51
Building Repair/Renovation - North Renovate building and convert to a new gift
Little Sahara Building shop Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 100,000 52
Update landscaping around the lodge to be
Roman Nose - Lodge Landscaping - Roman Nose Lodge more maintenance free Lodge Operations Upgrade 6 75,000 53
Equipment Storage - Roman Nose Need additional storage space for lodge tables
Roman Nose - Lodge Lodge and chairs Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 25,000 54
Roman Nose - Lodge Room Updates - Roman Nose Lodge Install new window shades in all lodge rooms Lodge Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 6 22,000 55
Quartz Mountain - Update landscaping around the lodge to be
Lodge Landscaping - Quartz Mountain Lodge more maintenance free Lodge Operations Upgrade 6 100,000 56
Quartz Mountain - Fountain Repairs - Quartz Mountain
Lodge Lodge Repair leaks in the courtyard fountain Lodge Operations Revenue Loss 6 25,000 57
Full exterior and interior renovation of 8 cabins
Osage Hills Cabin Repair/Renovation - Osage Hills at Osage Hills Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 800,000 58
Install new mini-splits to replace existing
Roman Nose - Lodge HVAC - Cabins window units Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 100,000 59
Exterior and floors need to be
Roman Nose - Lodge Building Maintenance - Pioneer Cabin restained/painted Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 10,000 60
Replace all interior FFE items in all Salt Plains
Salt Plains Cabin FFE - Salt Plains Cabins Cabins Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 6 60,000 61
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate the lodge building at the
Osage Hills Camp Lodge Group Camp for year round use Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 6 250,000 62
Building Repairs - Group Camp Repair/renovate the exterior and interior of the
Osage Hills Bunkhouses Group Camp Bunkhouses Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 6 900,000 63
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate Group Camp facilities to
Sequoyah Camp attract more usage Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 6 500,000 64
Replace existing pavilions with new structures,
Sequoyah Pavilions - Sequoyah 6 locations Pavilions Revenue Loss New 6 1,200,000 65
Full renovation of all Buster Heights RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
McGee Creek RV Campground - Buster Heights electric. RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 2,000,000 66
Replace electric service and pedestals for all
Lake Texoma RV Campground - Joe's Campground sites in the Joe's RV Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 6 230,000 67
Lake Murray - Golf Expand the practice green to better serve guest
Course Practice Green - Lake Murray GC needs Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 6 40,000 68
Lake Murray - Golf Rebuild tee boxes for better accommodation of
Course Tee Box Repair - Lake Murray GC increased play Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 6 150,000 69
Cedar Creek - Golf Repair various areas around the course to
Course Erosion Control - Cedar Creek GC allow for better drainage and erosion control Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 6 50,000 70
Cedar Creek - Golf Rebuild tee boxes for better accommodation of
Course Tee Box Repair - Cedar Creek GC increased play Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 6 100,000 71
Cedar Creek - Golf Remove trees, add top soil and sod to improve
Course Turf Admin - Cedar Creek GC playing conditions Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 6 250,000 72
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 6 Contingency Allowance - Year 6 Contingency Contingency 6 4,658,000 73
Project Estimated Cost 34,800,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 7,500,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 6 42,300,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 7
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 58
Osage Hills RV Campground Repair/renovation of RV site 18 for ADA access RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 7 80,000 1
Repair/renovation of all Osage Hills RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Osage Hills RV Campground - Osage Hills electric. RV CG Health & Safety Renovation 7 1,520,000 2
Repair/renovation of 89 Catfish Cove RV sites.
Will include: sitework, water, sewer, and
Fort Cobb RV Campground - Catfish Cove electric. RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 7 7,100,000 3
Repair/renovation of 11 RV and 14 Tent sites in
Fort Cobb RV Campground - Tent Hill the Tent Hill Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,000,000 4
Fort Cobb RV Campground - Eagle's Nest Add sewer to 25 existing sites RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 5
Repair/renovate 34 Great Plains RV sites. This
Great Plains State Park RV Campground - Great Plains will include sitework only RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 7 850,000 6
Replace electric service and pedestals for sites
Natural Falls RV Campground - Natural Falls in the Natural Falls RV Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 7 225,000 7
Replace electric service and pedestals for sites
Cherokee Landing RV Campground - Cherokee Area in the Cherokee RV Campground RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 7 50,000 8
Exterior renovation to include repair/replace
Cabin Repair/Renovation - Riverfront siding, windows, and doors in the Riverfront
Beavers Bend Area Area Cabins Revenue Loss Renovation 7 800,000 9
Replace water pump servicing the golf course
Arrowhead - Golf Course Water Pump - Irrigation Pond irrigation pond Golf Revenue Loss 7 25,000 10
Replace culvert on hole 17 to allow for better
Arrowhead - Golf Course Erosion Control - Arrowhead Hole 17 drainage Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 20,000 11
Rebuild tee boxes for better accommodation of
Arrowhead - Golf Course Tee Box Renovation - Arrowhead GC increased play Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 100,000 12
Repair/replace the irrigation system for the
Fort Cobb - Golf Course Irrigation System - Fort Cobb GC complete golf course Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,200,000 13
Repair/replace damaged portions of the
existing cart path, reroute as needed to
Fort Cobb - Golf Course Cart Path - Fort Cobb GC address erosion issues Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 100,000 14
Install new pump equipment to keep golf
Fort Cobb - Golf Course Water Pump - Irrigation System course irrigation system functioning properly Golf Revenue Loss 7 50,000 15
Tree and brush removal along the lake for
Fort Cobb - Golf Course Tree Removal - Fort Cobb GC better visibility from the course Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 50,000 16
Complete the greens renovation with new
Fort Cobb - Golf Course Turf Admin - Fort Cobb GC TifEagle Bermuda Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 75,000 17
Roman Nose - Golf
Course Cart Storage - Roman Nose GC Add storage facility for golf carts Golf Revenue Loss New 7 200,000 18
Roman Nose - Golf Repair/replace the irrigation system for all
Course Irrigation System - Roman Nose GC areas around the golf course Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,200,000 19
Roman Nose - Golf Rebuild tee boxes for better accommodation of
Course Tee Box Repair - Roman Nose GC year round play Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 150,000 20
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate exterior and interior of the A-
Roman Nose Camp Bunkhouses frame bunkhouses Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,000,000 21
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate exterior and interior of the
Roman Nose Camp Community Building Community Building Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,000,000 22
Repair/renovate the restroom at the Turkey
Roman Nose Restroom - Group Camp Roost Group Camp Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 23
Repair/renovate exteriors and interiors of all
Group Camp structures to allow for year round
Building Repair/Renovation - Group usage, remove unwanted and hazardous trees
Quartz Mountain - Park Camp from the area Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,800,000 24
Repair/renovate exteriors and interiors of all
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Group Camp 2 structures to allow for year
Robbers Cave Camp 2 round usage Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,500,000 25
Building Repair/Renovation - Repair/renovate exterior and interior of the
Tenkiller Community Building Community Building, assess for new decking Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 7 350,000 26
Building Repair/Renovation - Repair/renovate one of the buildings and demo
Tenkiller Maintenance Compound the others. Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 27
Repair/renovate exterior and interior, assess
Cedar Creek - Golf Building Repair/Renovation - Cedar the ability to increase the size to better handle
Course Creek Proshop more play and tournaments Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 1,000,000 28
Cedar Creek - Golf
Course Cart Storage - Cedar Creek GC Add storage facility for golf carts Golf Revenue Loss New 7 200,000 29
Building Repair/Renovation - Fort Cobb Repair/renovate exterior and interior of
Fort Cobb - Golf Course GC proshop Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 750,000 30
Fort Cobb - Golf Course Cart Storage - Fort Cobb GC Add storage facility for golf carts Golf Revenue Loss New 7 200,000 31
Grand Cherokee - Golf
Course Cart Storage - Grand Cherokee GC Add storage facility for golf carts Golf Revenue Loss New 7 200,000 32
Grand Cherokee - Golf
Course Bunkers - Grand Cherokee GC Restore all bunkers on the course Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 150,000 33
Repair/replace the irrigation system for select
Sequoyah - Golf Course Irrigation System - Sequoyah GC areas around the golf course Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 500,000 34
Repair/replace damaged portions of the
existing cart path, reroute as needed to
Sequoyah - Golf Course Cart Path - Sequoyah GC address erosion issues Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 150,000 35
Sequoyah - Golf Course Bridge Addition - Sequoyah GC Add new bridges to holes 13, 14 Golf Revenue Loss New 7 150,000 36
Site work needed around cart path around
Sequoyah - Golf Course Erosion Control - Sequoyah GC 10/18 for better drainage Golf Revenue Loss 7 25,000 37
Sequoyah - Golf Course Erosion Control - Sequoyah GC Add new pond to course for water runoff Golf Revenue Loss New 7 25,000 38
Relocate the tee box on hole 13 due to flooding
Sequoyah - Golf Course Tee Box Relocation - Sequoyah GC issues Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 6,000 39
Add top soil and sod on fairways and tee boxes
Sequoyah - Golf Course Turf Admin - Sequoyah GC to improve playing conditions Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 200,000 40
Expand the green on 14, 17, 18 to allow for
Sequoyah - Golf Course Expand Green - Sequoyah GC more pin placements Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 75,000 41
Sequoyah - Golf Course Bunkers - Sequoya GC Add 9 new bunkers to improve course layout Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 90,000 42
Sequoyah - Golf Course Disc Golf - Sequoyah GC Add new disc golf course at Sequoyah Golf Revenue Loss New 7 20,000 43
Sequoyah - Golf Course Front 9 Reopen - Sequoyah GC Reopen the front nine of the golf course Golf Revenue Loss 7 175,000 44
Cherokee Landing Sports Court - Cherokee Landing Repair and relocate sand volleyball court Park Operations Upgrade 7 25,000 45

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 7
Priority
New Construction or Project Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Planning Year Estimate 58
Cherokee Landing Sports Field - Cherokee Landing Repair/renovate the softball field area Park Operations Upgrade 7 50,000 46
Building Repair/Renovation - Park Repair or replace the existing park
Roman Nose Office/Proshop office/proshop building at Roman Nose Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 7 2,000,000 47
Renovate/Relocate - Park Office and Assess the potential for relocating the park
Tenkiller Nature Center office and nature center Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 48
Convert the pool area to a splash pad.
Tenkiller Pool Conversion - Tenkiller Personnel shortages impact pool operations Pool Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 49
Sequoyah - Golf Course Building Renovation - Proshop Repair exterior and interior of proshop Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 500,000 50
Building Renovation - Tournament Repair/renovate to accommodate larger
Sequoyah - Golf Course Barn tournament groups an other events in the park Golf Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 51
Building Repair/Renovation - Repair/renovate the existing maintenance
Sequoyah Bay Maintenance Barn facility at Sequoyah Bay Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 7 300,000 52
Building Renovation - Group Camp 2
Boiling Springs Water Tower Repair the exterior of the CCC water tower Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 7 30,000 53
Assess restrooms for repair or replacement.
Boiling Springs Restroom - Group Camp 2 There are two separate structures Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 500,000 54
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate the exteriors and add ADA
Boiling Springs Camp 2 Bunkhouses compliant parking Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 550,000 55
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair/renovate exterior and interior of the
Boiling Springs Camp 2 Community Building building, update restroom for ADA access Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 300,000 56
Building Repair/Renovation - Group Repair the Chapel to allow for more guest
Boiling Springs Camp 2 Chapel usage Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 7 250,000 57
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 7 Contingency Allowance - Year 7 Contingency Contingency 7 4,634,000 58
Project Estimated Cost 35,000,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 7,500,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 7 42,500,000

OTRD Capital Needs 8 Year Plan
Year 8
Priority
New Construction or Project Planning Project Cost Ranking 1-
Park Location Project Name Project Description Project Category Priority Category Renovation Year Estimate 14
Repair/replace the small shade structures
Foss Pavilions - Foss throughout the park in tent and day use areas Pavilions Revenue Loss Renovation 8 750,000 1
Building Repair/Renovation - Park
Honey Creek Office Repair/renovate the park office at Honey Creek Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 8 250,000 2
Repair/replace the splash pad fixtures at the
Sequoyah - Lodge Splash Pad - Sequoyah Lodge pool Pool Revenue Loss Renovation 8 100,000 3
Assess and repair/renovate Lake View RV
Quartz Mountain - Park RV Campground - Lake View Campground, RV CG Revenue Loss Renovation 8 600,000 4
Building Repair/Renovation - Caddo Replace windows, doors, and flooring. Need
Fort Cobb Hill Community Building interior FFE Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 8 250,000 5
Building Repair/Renovation - Eagle's Replace windows, doors, and flooring. Need
Fort Cobb Nest Community Building interior FFE Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 8 250,000 6
Demo old cabins and renovate the community
Building Repair/Renovation - Group building. Assess the area for better use of the
Black Mesa Camp space and facilities Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 8 500,000 7
Assess the park office for renovation or
Building Repair/Renovation - Park replacement. Current office is small with
Black Mesa Office limited space for staff and gift shop Park Operations Revenue Loss Renovation 8 750,000 8
Repair/renovate existing structure and convert
Boiling Springs Building Renovation - Nurses Cabin to a rentable cabin Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 8 250,000 9
Repair/renovate exterior and interior and
Building Renovation - Group Camp 1 create a new entrance and connection to
Boiling Springs Chapel Whitetail Campground Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 8 500,000 10
Building Renovation - Group Camp 1 Repair/renovate exterior and interior of CCC
Boiling Springs Community Building Community Building Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 8 750,000 11
Repair/renovate existing bunkhouses and
Building Renovation - Group Camp 1 convert to rentable cabins, reconfigure or add
Boiling Springs Bunkhouses roadways through the cabin area Group Camp Revenue Loss Renovation 8 3,000,000 12
Add new cabins in the Group Camp 1 Area,
Robbers Cave Cabin Replacement - Group Camp 1 need to assess overall scope for the area Group Camp Revenue Loss New 8 3,000,000 13
System Wide Contingency Allowance - Year 8 Contingency Allowance - Year 8 Contingency Contingency 8 2,280,000 14
Project Estimated Cost 13,230,000
Plus: Allocation for Roads/Parking 6,770,000
Project Estimated Cost - Year 8 20,000,000